Oklahoma, session 2025, SB952.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 3-123, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3-123. The board of education of any school district


may shall, and the governing board of any municipality shall,


furnish a room or rooms in any school building or municipal building


for use as a polling place at no cost.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 14-115.1, as


last amended by Section 21, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (26 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 14-115.1), is amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 735 Page 1


Section 14-115.1. A. A registered voter who becomes physically


incapacitated after the deadline to request an absentee ballot as


provided in Section 14-103 of this title and is unable to vote in


person at the appropriate precinct on the day of the election may


make a written request for an absentee ballot. Requirements for


matching of name, birth date, and identification number established


pursuant to Section 14-105 of this title shall apply to a request


for absentee ballots under this section.


B. 1. The request shall be signed by the voter or signed by a


witness at the voter’s direction if the voter is unable to sign his


or her name, and shall be transmitted to the secretary of the county


election board.


2. The person transmitting the request on behalf of the voter


may be anyone of the voter’s choosing who is at least sixteen (16)


years of age; provided, the person is not employed by nor related


within the third degree of consanguinity or affinity to any person


whose name appears on the ballot.


3. The person becomes the voter’s agent for purposes of voting


by absentee ballot. The voter’s request must be accompanied by a


sworn statement by a duly licensed physician, physician assistant,


nurse practitioner, or licensed midwife. Expected or likely


confinement for childbirth on election day is sufficient cause to


entitle a voter to vote absentee pursuant to this section. The


physician’s statement must attest to the fact that the voter is in

Req. No. 735 Page 2


fact unable to vote in person at the appropriate precinct on the day


of the election because of a physical incapacity and that the


physical incapacity originated after the deadline to request an


absentee ballot as provided in Section 14-103 of this title.


4. Upon receipt of the voter’s request and accompanying sworn


statement, the secretary of the county election board shall issue to


the voter’s agent the appropriate ballots and envelopes required for


voting by incapacitated voters.


5. The ballots must be returned by the agent to the secretary


of the county election board no later than 7:00 p.m. on the day of


the election. No person may be the agent for more than one voter at


any election. Upon return of the absentee ballots, the secretary of


the county election board shall cause the ballots to be processed in


the same manner as is prescribed for other absentee ballots.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-735 TEK 1/19/2025 5:46:37 AM















Req. No. 735 Page 3